Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1536
Sales of lands or tenements; where held; officer disqualified to purchase.

All sales of lands or tenements under execution shall be held at the courthouse, if there be one in the county in which such lands and tenements are situated, and if there be no courthouse, then at the door of the house in which the district court was last held. No sheriff or other officer making the sale of property, either personal or real, or any appraiser of such property, shall, either directly or indirectly, purchase the same; and every purchase so made shall be considered fraudulent and void.

R.S.1867, Code § 503, p. 479;

R.S.1913, § 8082;

C.S.1922, § 9018;

C.S.1929, § 20-1536;

R.S.1943, § 25-1536.

A judicial sale advertised for the front door of the courthouse may be held at the front of the steps on the first floor inside the courthouse. Hollstein v. Adams, 187 Neb. 781, 194 N.W.2d 216 (1972).

Sale advertised to be held at the south door of a courthouse is sufficient. Peck v. Starks, 64 Neb. 341, 89 N.W. 1040 (1902).

Sale of lands under mortgage foreclosure decree must take place at courthouse. Smith Bros. Loan & Trust Co. v. Weiss, 56 Neb. 210, 76 N.W. 564 (1898).

Sale made to one of appraisers was void. Best v. Zutavern, 53 Neb. 604, 74 N.W. 64 (1898).